Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-404
Merger of Class I districts within boundaries of Class VI district; not prohibited.

Section 79-403 does not prohibit the merger of Class I districts or parts of Class I districts within the boundaries of a Class VI district.

Laws 1969, c. 703, § 2, p. 2703;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-102.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 153;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 57;

Referendum 2006, No. 422.